Tennessee, session 114, SB0668.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 68-3-511(4)(B), is amended by
deleting the subdivision and substituting:
(B) The attending physician has agreed in writing to sign the death certificate.
The agreement by the attending physician must be present with the deceased at the
place of death;
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB0668
001047
- 1 -